Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2497.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Title 17, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 17-106, to read: START_STATUTE17-106. Right to hunt, fish and harvest wildlife; public policy A. The citizens of this state have a right to lawfully hunt, fish and harvest wildlife. B. As prescribed in section 17-102, wildlife is the property of this state and is held in trust for the benefit of the citizens of this state. C. The legislature has exclusive authority to regulate the manner, methods and seasons for hunting, fishing and harvesting wildlife. The legislature may delegate the rulemaking authority to the commission as provided in this title. D. the commission may not enact or adopt any rule or policy that unreasonably restricts hunting, fishing and harvesting wildlife or the use of traditional means and methods. E. It is the policy of this state that public hunting and fishing are the preferred means of managing and controlling wildlife. F. This section does not modify any provision of common law or any law of this state relating to trespass or property rights. END_STATUTE Sec. 2.2. Short title This act may be cited as the "Arizona Right to Hunt Act".